Utah statutes.
58-77-201.   Board.
(1)  There is created the Licensed Direct-entry Midwife Board consisting of:
(a)  four licensed Direct-entry midwives; and
(b)  one member of the general public.
(2)  The board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section
58-1-201.
(3) (a)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance
with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.
(b)  The board shall designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating
basis to:
(i)  assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or
unprofessional conduct of a licensed Direct-entry midwife; and
(ii)  advise the division in its investigation of these complaints.
(c) (i)  For the years 2006 through 2011, the board shall present an annual
report to the Legislature's Health and Human Services Interim Committee
describing the outcome data of licensed Direct-entry midwives practicing in
Utah.
(ii)  The board shall base its report on data provided in large part from the
Midwives' Alliance of North America.
(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3), reviewed a complaint or
advised in its investigation may be disqualified from participating with the
board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative
proceeding concerning the complaint.
(5)  Qualified faculty, board members, and other staff of Direct-entry
midwifery learning institutions may serve as one or more of the licensed
Directed-entry midwives on the board.
